test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_njuhca_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# ok

Tests:

  Noun - njuhčâ:
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Nom: njuhčâ
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Gen: njuuvčâ
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Acc: njuuvčâ
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Ill: njuuhčân
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Loc: njuuvčâst
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Com: njuvččáin
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Abe: njuˊvčâttáá
    njuhčâ+N+Ess: njuhčân
    njuhčâ+N+Par: njuhčâd
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Nom: njuuvčah
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Gen: [njuuvčâi, njuˊvčâi]
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Acc: njuuvčâid
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Ill: njuvččáid
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Loc: njuuvčâin
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Com: njuˊvčâiguin
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Abe: njuˊvčâittáá

  Noun - kiksâ:
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Nom: kiksâ
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Gen: kiivsâ
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Acc: kiivsâ
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Ill: kiiksân
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Loc: kiivsâst
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Com: kivssáin
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Abe: kiˊvsâttáá
    kiksâ+N+Ess: kiksân
    kiksâ+N+Par: kiksâd
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Nom: kiivsah
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kiivsâi, kiˊvsâi]
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Acc: kiivsâid
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Ill: kivssáid
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Loc: kiivsâin
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Com: kiˊvsâiguin
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Abe: kiˊvsâittáá

  Noun - lahcâ:
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Nom: lahcâ
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Gen: laavcâ
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Acc: laavcâ
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Ill: laahcân
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Loc: laavcâst
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Com: lavccáin
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Abe: laˊvcâttáá
    lahcâ+N+Ess: lahcân
    lahcâ+N+Par: lahcâd
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Nom: laavcah
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Gen: [laavcâi, laˊvcâi]
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Acc: laavcâid
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Ill: lavccáid
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Loc: laavcâin
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Com: laˊvcâiguin
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Abe: laˊvcâittáá
    
  Noun - tekstâ:
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Nom: tekstâ
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Gen: teevstâ
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Acc: teevstâ
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Ill: teekstân
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Loc: teevstâst
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Com: tevstáin
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Abe: teˊvstâttáá
    tekstâ+N+Ess: tekstân
    tekstâ+N+Par: tekstâd
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Nom: teevstah
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Gen: [teevstâi, teˊvstâi]
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Acc: teevstâid
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Ill: tevstáid
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Loc: teevstâin
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Com: teˊvstâiguin
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Abe: teˊvstâittáá
